New Jersey, session 221, A2585.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    a.  For the purposes of this section: Edna Mahan trauma credits refer to credits awarded pursuant to section 1 of P.L. , c.   (C.        ) (pending before the Legislature as this bill) to an inmate in the Edna Mahan Correctional Facility for Women for time served by the inmate during the period of investigation into allegations of sexual abuse of inmates by correctional police officers and staff at the facility conducted by the: Civil Rights Division of the United States Department of Justice, United States Attorneys Office District of New Jersey, Hunterdon County Prosecutors office, office of the Attorney General of the State of New Jersey, and Governor of the State of New Jersey. Period of investigation means the period during which the Civil Rights Division of the United States Department of Justice, the United States Attorneys Office District of New Jersey, Hunterdon County Prosecutors office, Attorney General of the State of New Jersey, and the Governor of the State of New Jersey conducted an investigation into allegations of the sexual abuse of inmates by correctional police officers and staff at the Edna Mahan Correctional Facility for Women. The period of investigation shall begin on April 26, 2018, the date the investigation by the Civil Rights Division of the United States Department of Justice and the United States Attorneys Office District of New Jersey was initiated, and shall terminate on the effective date of section 1 of P.L.     , c.   (C.        ) (pending before the Legislature as this bill). b.    In addition to any credits awarded pursuant to R.S.30:4-92; section 3 of P.L.2009, c.330 (C.30:4-92a); R.S.30:4-140, and section 1 of P.L.2020, c.111 (C. 30:4-123.100), Edna Mahan trauma credits shall be awarded pursuant to this section to an inmate incarcerated in the Edna Mahan Correctional Facility for Women during the period of investigation into allegations of the sexual abuse of inmates at the facility. c.     The Edna Mahan trauma credits awarded pursuant to this section shall provide further remission from both the maximum and minimum term of the inmate's sentence, including the statutory mandatory minimum term, at the rate of 183 days for each year, or portion thereof, served by an inmate confined in the Edna Mahan Correctional Facility for Women during the period of investigation.  An inmate shall not be awarded Edna Mahan trauma credits pursuant to this section in excess of 365 days of remission. d.    Nothing in this section shall be deemed to limit an inmate's eligibility for parole consideration under the law governing parole. 2.    This act shall take effect immediately.